Idaho, session 2026, S1336.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1602. UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION -- NATIONAL FLAG AND COLORS -- NA-
TIONAL ANTHEM -- "AMERICA" -- CITIZENSHIP -- CIVICS TEST. (1) The legisla-
ture finds that a somber reflection on the history of mankind shows that no
free government or the blessings of liberty can be preserved by any people
except through an adherence to moral virtue and by frequent recurrence to
fundamental principles. The legislature finds and declares that the pri-
mary purpose of this state's system of public schools is to equip the youth
of the state with the virtue and intelligence necessary for self-government
through a liberal program of education that inspires a love of nation, fellow
countrymen, and common history and culture.
(2) All secondary pupils at an Idaho public school shall receive in-
struction that ensures upon graduation that such pupils:
(a) Exemplify the cardinal virtues necessary for self-government and
human flourishing, including:
(i) Prudence;
(ii) Justice;
(iii) Fortitude;
(iv) Moderation; and
(v) Patriotism;
(b) Understand the fundamental principles of the nation's republican
form of government, including:
(i) The supremacy of the natural law over civil institutions;
(ii) That virtue or morality is a necessary spring of popular gov-
ernment and ordered liberty;
(iii) The self-evident truth that all men are created equal and
endowed by their creator with inalienable rights;
(iv) That civil society is a social compact, by which the whole
people covenants with each citizen and each citizen with the whole
people, and that all shall be governed by certain laws for the com-
mon good;
(v) That as members of the body-politic, every citizen has a duty
to promote the common good of the whole;


(vi) That the people are the original fountain of all legitimate
authority, denoting that just government is contingent upon the
consent of the governed;
(vii) That the first aim of every political constitution is to ob-
tain leaders who possess the most wisdom to discern and most virtue
to pursue the common good of the society, and that this is most ef-
fectually accomplished through a system of representation;
(viii) The rule of law and not of men;
(ix) Reverence for the republic's constitutional order and the
importance of the separation of powers as a bulwark against arbi-
trary and despotic government;
(x) The double security given to American liberties by the con-
stitution's system of federalism and the value of the union as the
source of national prosperity and independence; and
(xi) That the preservation of the republic depends, above all
else, on the vigilance and public-spiritedness of the American
people; and
(c) Understand the content, history, meaning, significance, and effect
of key historical documents, including:
(i) The magna carta;
(ii) The mayflower compact;
(iii) The Massachusetts body of liberties;
(iv) The English bill of rights and act of toleration;
(v) Patrick Henry's "Give Me Liberty or Give Me Death!";
(vi) Thomas Paine's "Common Sense";
(vii) The declaration of independence;
(viii) The articles of confederation;
(ix) The Virginia declaration of rights of 1776;
(x) The Massachusetts constitution of 1780;
(xi) The Rhode Island 1784 act for the abolition of slavery;
(xii) The Northwest ordinance;
(xiii) The Virginia statute for religious freedom;
(xiv) The United States constitution and the bill of rights;
(xv) The federalist papers;
(xvi) George Washington's letter to the Hebrew congregation;
(xvii) George Washington's farewell address;
(xviii) Thomas Jefferson's first inaugural address;
(xix) The Monroe doctrine;
(xx) Alexis de Tocqueville's "Democracy in America";
(xxi) The Lincoln-Douglass debates;
(xxii) The emancipation proclamation;
(xxiii) The Gettysburg address;
(xxiv) The constitution of the state of Idaho; and
(xxv) Other similar documents that are important to the history
and heritage of the United States and Idaho.
(3) All secondary pupils in grades 9 through 12 shall be required to
complete two (2) credits in American history and two (2) credits in American
government, encompassing a strong emphasis on civics.


(4) American history coursework in all public schools shall include in-
struction on the American revolution and the American founding, with atten-
tion given to the following, at a minimum:
(a) How the American founding was the culmination of the Western tra-
dition, including the influence of Christianity, the enlightenment,
Greek democracy, Roman republicanism, and the English legal tradition;
(b) The fundamental principles of the American revolution as articu-
lated in the declaration of independence, including liberty, equality,
natural rights, national sovereignty, republican virtue, and self-gov-
ernment;
(c) The contribution of America's original Anglo-American heritage and
colonial experience to the development of the nation's republican in-
stitutions;
(d) The political and military narrative of the causes and progress of
the American revolution;
(e) The deeds and civic virtues exemplified in the lives of America's
founding fathers;
(f) The United States' founding documents and their original intent;
(g) Instruction on the symbols associated with America's national
heritage originating from the American revolution, including the min-
uteman, the liberty bell, the liberty tree, lady Columbia, the great
seal of the United States, the pine tree flag, the Gadsden flag, "join or
die," the Betsy Ross flag, and the bald eagle;
(h) The historical development of the United States' republican form of
government, including the proceedings of the Philadelphia convention
and ratification debates that led to the adoption of the United States
constitution and the bill of rights;
(i) The political narrative of the early republic under the founding
presidents; and
(j) How slavery is antithetical to the principles of the declaration of
independence and the efforts during the American founding and early re-
public to abolish slavery.
(5) American history coursework in all public schools shall include in-
struction on how totalitarian ideologies, such as communism and fascism, are
antithetical to the fundamental principles of America's republican form of
government, with attention given to, at a minimum:
(a) America's triumph over totalitarian regimes in the second world war
and cold war; and
(b) The failures and atrocities of Nazi Germany, the Soviet Union, and
People's Republic of China, including Kristallnacht, the Holocaust,
the red terror, dekulakization, Stalin's great purge, the five-year
plan, the holodomor, the great leap forward, and the cultural revolu-
tion.
(6) American government coursework in all public schools shall ensure
that students understand the fundamental principles of America's republican
form of government outlined in subsection (2)(b) of this section, and shall
include instruction on:
(a) The influence of the Western intellectual tradition on the United
States constitution, including the political philosophy of John Locke


and Montesquieu, Greek democracy, Roman republicanism, and British
constitutionalism;
(b) Primary documents articulating the fundamental principles of Amer-
ica's constitutional system of government, including excerpts from the
declaration of independence, the preamble of the Massachusetts consti-
tution of 1780, George Washington's letter to the Hebrew congregation,
"Federalist 9," "Federalist 10," "Federalist 39," "Federalist 51,"
"Federalist 63," "Federalist 70," and "Federalist 78;" and
(c) How the constitution of the state of Idaho embodies the principles
of the American founding, such as section 1, article I, regarding the
inalienable rights of man; section 2, article I, regarding the polit-
ical power inherent in the people; section 3, article I, regarding the
state as an inseparable part of the union; section 1, article II, re-
garding the departments of government; section 24, article III, regard-
ing the promotion of temperance and morality; section 1, article IX, re-
garding the legislature's duty to establish a system of free schools;
and section 1, article XIV, regarding persons subject to military duty.
(7) All public schools shall include instruction in secondary English
language arts or communications coursework that incorporates, when appro-
priate, primary documents and literature from or about the American revo-
lution, American founding, or early republic, provided that such materials
align with the criteria provided in section 33-118C, Idaho Code.
(1) (8) Instruction in the United States constitution, the fundamental
principles of America's republican form of government, and the virtues nec-
essary for good citizenship shall be given in all elementary and secondary
schools. The state board of education shall adopt any materials as may be
deemed necessary for such purpose and shall also determine the grades in
which such instruction shall be given.
(2) (9) Instruction in the proper use, display, and history of and re-
spect for the American flag and the national colors shall be given in all ele-
mentary and secondary schools. Such instruction shall include the pledge of
allegiance to the flag and the words and music of the national anthem and of
"America."
(3) (10) Every school board of trustees shall cause the United States
flag to be displayed in every classroom during the school hours of each
school day.
(11) Every school board of trustees is encouraged to display histori-
cal portraits of George Washington in a conspicuous place in each classroom
that is used for history, civics, or social studies instruction and in each
kindergarten through grade 5 classroom. The state superintendent of public
instruction, or designee, shall select the portraits.
(4) (12) Every public school shall offer the pledge of allegiance or the
national anthem in grades 1 through 12 at the beginning of each school day.
(5) (13) No pupil shall be compelled, against the pupil's objections or
those of the pupil's parent or guardian, to recite the pledge of allegiance
or to sing the national anthem.
(6) (14) Instruction in citizenship shall be given in all elementary
and secondary schools. Citizenship instruction shall include lessons on
the role of a citizen in a constitutional republic, how laws are made, how
officials are elected, and the importance of voting and of participating in


government. Such instruction shall also include the importance of respect-
ing and obeying statutes that are validly and lawfully enacted by the Idaho
legislature and the congress of the United States.
(7) (15) Starting with the 2016-2017 school year, all secondary pupils
shall show that they have met the state civics and government standards for
such instruction through the successful completion of the civics test, par-
ticipation in a course in United States government and politics, and par-
ticipation in an associated college credit-bearing examination or alternate
path established by the local school district or charter school that shows
the student has met the standards. Assessment of standards shall be included
as part of the course at the secondary level. Students graduating prior to
January 1, 2029, who have satisfied the requirement outlined in this subsec-
tion prior to the start of the 2026-2027 school year are exempt from complet-
ing the requirement provided for in subsection (8) (16) of this section.
(8) (16) Beginning with the 2026-2027 2027-2028 school year, all sec-
ondary pupils shall show that they have met the state civics and government
standards for such instruction through the successful completion of the
civics test and participation in a course in United States government and
history, or participation in an associated college credit-bearing course
or examination. Assessment of standards shall be included as part of the
course at the secondary level. A school district or public charter school
shall document on the pupil's transcript that the pupil has passed the civics
test pursuant to this subsection. The school district or governing body of
the charter school may state superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee shall determine the method and manner in which
to administer the civics test. A pupil may take the civics test at any time
after enrolling in grade 9 and may repeat the test as often as necessary to
pass the test. The applicability of this subsection to a pupil who receives
special education services shall be governed by such pupil's individualized
education plan. For the purposes of this subsection, "civics test" means
an assessment developed by the state department of education state super-
intendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee with the
approval of the state board of education that includes but is not limited
to the following components from the Idaho content standards in American
government:
(a) The influence of the history of Western civilization on the found-
ing of the American republic, including Greek democracy, Roman republi-
canism, and the English political and legal tradition;
(b) The arguments presented in the declaration of independence;
(c) The governing principles at the foundation of the United States
constitution, including popular sovereignty, rule of law, federalism,
separation of powers, checks and balances, judicial review, and major-
ity rule and protection of minority rights;
(d) The role of the bill of rights in limiting the powers of government
and protecting individual rights;
(e) The enumerated powers of the United States congress, including ap-
propriations, declarations of war, commerce, confirmations, necessary
and proper clauses, and oversight and impeachment;
(f) The legislative process of how a bill becomes law;


(g) Article II of the United States constitution as it relates to the
executive branch and the powers of the president, along with the devel-
opment and growth of administrative agencies;
(h) The function and development of the electoral college;
(i) The power of the judiciary as conferred by article III of the United
States constitution and legal precedents that developed these powers;
(j) The functions, powers, interactions, and dynamic relationships
among federal, state, local, and tribal governments, including the
tenth amendment to the United States constitution and legal precedent;
and
(k) The organization and powers of state and local government as de-
scribed in the constitution of the state of Idaho, including the leg-
islative, executive, and judicial branches.
(9) (17) Components of the assessment developed pursuant to subsection
(8) (16) of this section shall be reviewed concurrently with the review of
the Idaho content standards in American government. The state board of edu-
cation may promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, implementing
the provisions of subsection (8) (16) of this section.
(10) (18) Subject to state-appropriated funds, the state department
of education shall make available funding for high quality professional
development focused on advanced high school civics or government courses,
including those with college credit-bearing civics or government examina-
tions Western civilization, or United States history courses. Allowable
expenses include summer institutes offered at different sites throughout
the state United States and workshops to help high school teachers prepare
students for success in college-level courses.
(19) A public charter school may request from the state board of educa-
tion an exemption from subsections (2)(c) and (4) through (7) of this section
based on the public charter school's unique mission as outlined in its per-
formance certificate.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-118C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-118C. CURRICULAR MATERIALS -- HISTORY AND CIVICS. (1) Notwith-
standing the provisions of section 33-118, Idaho Code, the legislature finds
that to promote the stability of America's republican form of government and
to establish and maintain a general, uniform, and thorough system of public,
free common schools, as provided in section 1, article IX of the constitution
of the state of Idaho, all curricular materials adopted by school districts
or public charter schools in the subjects of history, American government
and civics, and social studies shall:
(a) Align with the provisions of section 33-1602, Idaho Code;
(b) Align with state content standards established by the state board
of education;
(c) Be academically rigorous;
(d) Be historically and factually accurate;
(e) Directly utilize or otherwise promote engagement with primary
sources and documents;
(f) Inspire patriotism;


(g) Contribute to the cultivation of good moral character and the
virtues necessary for self-government and human flourishing;
(h) Cultivate knowledge and appreciation for the nation's history and
cultural heritage as derived from the tradition of Western civiliza-
tion; and
(i) Foster an appreciation for and attachment to America's republican
form of government, along with a proper understanding of the pupils'
rights and duties as citizens of the state of Idaho and the United
States.
(2) School districts and public charter schools shall have the discre-
tion to utilize other supplementary instructional materials, such as pri-
mary sources, documents, maps, or other resources, provided that such ma-
terials align with the requirements provided in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.